Washington statutes.
RCW 39.32.090

Purchases by political subdivisions from or through United States authorized.

Whenever authorized by ordinance or resolution of its legislative authority any political subdivision of the state shall have power to purchase supplies, materials, electronic data processing and telecommunication equipment, software, services, and/or equipment from or through the United States government without calling for bids, notwithstanding any law or charter provision to the contrary.

[ 2013 c 132 s 1; 1945 c 88 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10322-40. Formerly RCW 39.32.070, part.]